Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7179.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 106
VEHICLE BARRIERS
23-106-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Charlotte A. Vacca Act."
23-106-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Owner" means the proprietor, operator, lessor, or sublessor of commercial real estate
defined in § 34-49-2, which is utilized, in whole or in part, by a retail establishment.
(2) "Retail establishments" means all sales outlets, stores, shops, or other places of business
located within the state, which operate primarily to sell or convey food or goods.
(3) "Vehicle barrier" means a safety device that meets, at a minimum, the vehicle impact
protection standards as adopted and amended by the Rhode Island building code commission, and
that is installed to protect persons located within or on the property or to protect pedestrians, from
collisions into buildings by motor vehicles.
23-106-3. Installation of vehicle barriers.
(a) Owners, as a part of any new construction of commercial real estate or buildings

thereon, shall install vehicle barriers. Owners shall also be encouraged to install vehicle barriers at
the locations of all of the owner's other retail establishments to protect persons and pedestrians on
the property or within the establishment. Provided, any vehicle barrier shall be installed so that
there is sufficient space to ensure wheelchair access and to otherwise be in compliance with the
Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.) and any other applicable state and
local law regarding access for persons with disabilities.
(b) Provided, the vehicle barriers required under this section shall not be required
immediately in front of the entrance to the building if the parking lot lanes or stripe lines in the
front lot are parallel to, and not perpendicular to, the front entrance to the building.
23-106-4. Insurance discount.
(a) An insurer shall consider the installation of vehicle barriers as a safety measure and
shall provide or offer a discount on the owner's insurance covering damage or loss to the covered
commercial real estate or liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the
commercial real estate relative to the reduced risk to the property as a result of installation of the
vehicle barrier(s).
(b) Any discounts on insurance provided in accordance with this section shall be
determined to be actuarially sound and approved by the insurance commissioner prior to their
utilization by insurers.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003939
========
LC003939 - Page 2 of 3